apertium-kmr.kmr.dix
     <pardef n="Agir/î__np">
      <e><p><l>î</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyê</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ya</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yê</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yek</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yekê</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeke</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>î</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyên</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyan</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyên</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyin</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyinan</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyine</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyê</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyan</l><r>î<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>


    <pardef n="Kurdistan__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ekê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eke</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ên</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ên</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inan</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="Bexda__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ya</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yek</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yekê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeke</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yên</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yan</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yên</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yin</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yinan</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yine</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yan</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="Rom/a__np">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aya</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayê</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayek</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayekê</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayeke</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayên</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ên</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayan</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayên</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayin</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayinan</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayine</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayê</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayan</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

    <e lm="Sarî"><i>Sar</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Pekîn"><i>Pekîn</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Xarpêt"><i>Xarpêt</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Qeyserî"><i>Qeyser</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ukrayna"><i>Ukrayna</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Cezayir"><i>Cezayir</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="sovyet"><i>sovyet</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Luristan"><i>Luristan</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Virginia"><i>Virginia</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Marmara"><i>Marmara</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bexdad"><i>Bexdad</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="República"><i>República</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Amsterdam"><i>Amsterdam</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bosniya"><i>Bosniya</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hollanda"><i>Hollanda</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="mezopotamya"><i>mezopotamya</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mamekî"><i>Mamek</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ezirgan"><i>Ezirgan</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="mîtanî"><i>mîtan</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kopa"><i>Kopa</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Oltî"><i>Olt</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hezro"><i>Hezro</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dêrsîm"><i>Dêrsîm</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Guatemala"><i>Guatemala</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Barselona"><i>Barselona</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Malta"><i>Malta</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Oslo"><i>Oslo</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Awistraliya"><i>Awistraliya</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Romanya"><i>Romanya</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Endulus"><i>Endulus</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Metîna"><i>Metîna</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Qereyazî"><i>Qereyaz</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Japonya"><i>Japonya</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kûba"><i>Kûba</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Albanya"><i>Albanya</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Îstanbul"><i>Îstanbul</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lîbya"><i>Lîbya</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Prag"><i>Prag</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Columbia"><i>Columbia</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Meletî"><i>Melet</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Danîmarka"><i>Danîmarka</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lozan"><i>Lozan</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Porto"><i>Porto</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Korsîka"><i>Korsîka</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Silîvan"><i>Silîvan</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Libnan"><i>Libnan</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Berwarî"><i>Berwar</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dîvrîgiya"><i>Dîvrîgiya</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Roma"><i>Rom</i><par n="Rom/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mîtanî"><i>Mîtan</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Brazîl"><i>Brazîl</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="NY"><i>NY</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Efrîqa"><i>Efrîqa</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Miks"><i>Miks</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Cûdî"><i>Cûd</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Erxenî"><i>Erxen</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Qesra"><i>Qesra</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Silopî"><i>Silop</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Îsraîl"><i>Îsraîl</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Amêdî"><i>Amêd</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Meledî"><i>Meled</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rûsya"><i>Rûsya</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tehran"><i>Tehran</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nisêbîn"><i>Nisêbîn</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Brîtanya"><i>Brîtanya</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="London"><i>London</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Silêmanî"><i>Silêman</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kobanî"><i>Koban</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hekarî"><i>Hekar</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ewrûpa"><i>Ewrûpa</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Colemêrg"><i>Colemêrg</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dêrika"><i>Dêrika</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Fransa"><i>Fransa</i><par n="Bexda__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Agirî"><i>Agir</i><par n="Agir/î__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Wan"><i>Wan</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Afganistan"><i>Afganistan</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ûzbêkistan"><i>Ûzbêkistan</i><par n="Kurdistan__np"/></e>
